Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1318
Educational telecommunications; commission; instrumentality of state; may sue and be sued.

The Nebraska Educational Telecommunications Commission is hereby constituted an instrumentality of the State of Nebraska and may sue and be sued by the name Nebraska Educational Telecommunications Commission.

Laws 1963, c. 468, § 4, p. 1499;

Laws 1984, LB 645, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2104;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 974.